Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.074

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout section 3, chapter 243, Laws of 2010 and RCW 28A.175.075 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Critical community members" means representatives in the local community from among the following agencies and organizations: Student/parent organizations, parents and families, local government, law enforcement, juvenile corrections, any tribal organization in the local school district, the local health district, nonprofit and social service organizations serving youth, and faith organizations.

(2) "Dropout early warning and intervention data system" means a student information system that provides the data needed to conduct a universal screening to identify students at risk of dropping out, catalog student interventions, and monitor student progress towards graduation.

(3) "K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system" means a system that provides all of the following functions:

(a) Engaging in school improvement planning specifically focused on improving high school graduation rates, including goal-setting and action planning, based on a comprehensive assessment of strengths and challenges;

(b) Providing prevention activities including, but not limited to, emotionally and physically safe school environments, implementation of a comprehensive guidance and counseling model facilitated by certified school counselors, core academic instruction, and career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs;

(c) Identifying vulnerable students based on a dropout early warning and intervention data system;

(d) Timely academic and nonacademic group and individual interventions for vulnerable students based on a response to intervention model, including planning and sharing of information at critical academic transitions;

(e) Providing graduation coaches, mentors, certified school counselors, and/or case managers for vulnerable students identified as needing a more intensive one-on-one adult relationship;

(f) Establishing and providing staff to coordinate a school/family/community partnership that assists in building a K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system;

(g) Providing retrieval or reentry activities; and

(h) Providing alternative educational programming including, but not limited to, credit retrieval and online learning opportunities.

(4) "School/family/community partnership" means a partnership between a school or schools, families, and the community, that engages critical community members in a formal, structured partnership with local school districts in a coordinated effort to provide comprehensive support services and improve outcomes for vulnerable youth.

(5) "Vulnerable students" means students who are in foster care, involved in the juvenile justice system, receiving special education services under chapter 28A.155 RCW, recent immigrants, homeless, emotionally traumatized, or are facing behavioral health issues, and students deemed at-risk of school failure as identified by a dropout early warning data system or other assessment.

[ 2010 c 243 s 2.]